Georgia, session 2025_26, HB853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Property taxes for city purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes
levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Tunnel Hill, but excluding any ad valorem taxes
to pay interest on and to retire municipal bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended.
H. B. 853
- 1 -

LC 62 0196/AP
(b) Each resident of the City of Tunnel Hill who is 70 years of age or older is granted an
exemption on that person's homestead from City of Tunnel Hill ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes in the amount of $325,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead.
The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to
taxation.
(c) The surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided for in
subsection (b) of this section shall continue to receive such exemption, so long as that
surviving spouse continues to occupy the home as a residence and homestead.
(d) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless the person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority,
or its designee, of the City of Tunnel Hill giving such information relative to receiving such
exemption as will enable the governing authority, or its designee, to make a determination
regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such owner for such exemption. The
governing authority, or its designee, of the City of Tunnel Hill shall provide application
forms for this purpose.
(e) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the owner occupies the residence as a homestead. After a person has filed the
proper application as provided in subsection (d) of this section, it shall not be necessary to
make application thereafter for any year and the exemption shall continue to be allowed to
such person. It shall be the duty of any person granted the homestead exemption under
subsection (b) of this section to notify the governing authority, or its designee, of the
municipality in the event that person for any reason becomes ineligible for that exemption.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect state
ad valorem taxes, county or independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes, or county ad valorem taxes for county purposes. The homestead exemption
H. B. 853
- 2 -

LC 62 0196/AP
granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in lieu of and not in addition to any other
homestead exemption applicable to property taxes for city purposes.
(g) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after the first day of January of the year immediately following the approval
of this exemption by the voters as provided for in Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II, Paragraph II of the
Constitution of the State of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the
requisite two-thirds' majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Tunnel Hill shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Tunnel Hill for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent shall
conduct that election in concurrence with the municipal general election in November, 2025.
The municipal election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be
published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official
organ of the City of Tunnel Hill. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a new homestead exemption from
City of Tunnel Hill ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in the amount
( ) NO of $325,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for each resident of
that city who is 70 years of age or older?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and those persons
desiring to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes
cast on such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full
force and effect on the first day of January of the year immediately following the approval
H. B. 853
- 3 -

LC 62 0196/AP
of this exemption by the voters as provided in this section. If the Act is not so approved or
if the election is not conducted as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not
become effective, and this Act shall be automatically repealed on January 1, 2026. The
expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Tunnel Hill. It shall be the municipal
election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal election superintendent and
are not intended as directory. If the municipal election superintendent fails or refuses to
comply with this section, any elector of the City of Tunnel Hill may apply for a writ of
mandamus to compel the municipal election superintendent to perform his or her duties
under this section. If the court finds that the municipal election superintendent has not
complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal
election superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date required by this section
or on the next date authorized for special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540
of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 853
- 4 -